Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-918
Restoration of rights; when.

If the applicant or recipient or any member of the assistance group becomes ineligible for medical assistance, the department shall restore to him or her the rights assigned under section 68-916.

Laws 1984, LB 723, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 109;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1028;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 18.